Utah statutes.
63B-18-302.   Authorizations to lease or dispose of property.
(1)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management, acting in
coordination with the Utah State Fair Corporation, may negotiate with the Utah
Transit Authority for a long-term lease of land, or a license for long-term
use of land, to the Utah Transit Authority at the State Fairpark; and
(b)  before entering into a contract with the Utah Transit Authority, the
division shall:
(i)  obtain the approval of the State Building Board; and
(ii)  the State Building Board may approve the agreement only if the division
demonstrates that the contract terms agree with Section 63A-5-306 and will be
a benefit to the state.
(2)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Department of Workforce Services may, in coordination with the
Division of Facilities Construction and Management, sell a Temporary Placement
Office in Salt Lake City, Utah, and three vacated buildings in Logan, Utah;
and
(b)  sales shall be at fair market value.
